Louisiana, session 2026, HB660.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 16:10(A)(2) and 11(A)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§10. Annual salary of district attorneys payable by state
A.
* * *
(2) Effective July 1, 2020, the annual salary of the several district attorneys
throughout the state of Louisiana is hereby fixed at fifty-two thousand five hundred
dollars payable monthly by the state treasurer upon the warrant of the district
attorney. Effective July 1, 2021, the annual salary of the several district attorneys
throughout the state of Louisiana is hereby fixed at fifty-five thousand dollars
payable monthly by the state treasurer upon the warrant of the district attorney.
Effective July 1, 2026, the annual salary of the several district attorneys throughout
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1338 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 660
the state of Louisiana is hereby fixed at sixty-five thousand dollars payable monthly
by the state treasurer upon the warrant of the district attorney.
* * *
§11. Annual salary of assistant district attorneys payable by state
A.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, effective July
1, 2006, the annual salary of each of the several assistant district attorneys
throughout the state of Louisiana, including the parish of Orleans, is hereby fixed at
thirty-five thousand dollars payable monthly by the state treasurer upon the warrant
of each of the assistant district attorneys. Effective July 1, 2007, the annual salary
of each of the several assistant district attorneys, throughout the state of Louisiana,
including the parish of Orleans, is hereby fixed at forty thousand dollars payable
monthly by the state treasurer upon the warrant of each of the assistant district
attorneys. Effective July 1, 2008, the annual salary of each of the several assistant
district attorneys, throughout the state of Louisiana, including the parish of Orleans,
is hereby fixed at forty-five thousand dollars payable monthly by the state treasurer
upon the warrant of each of the assistant district attorneys. Effective July 1, 2020,
the annual salary of each of the several assistant district attorneys throughout the
state of Louisiana, including the parish of Orleans, is hereby fixed at forty-seven
thousand five hundred dollars payable monthly by the state treasurer upon the
warrant of each of the assistant district attorneys. Effective July 1, 2021, the annual
salary of each of the several assistant district attorneys throughout the state of
Louisiana, including the parish of Orleans, is hereby fixed at fifty thousand dollars
payable monthly by the state treasurer upon the warrant of each of the assistant
district attorneys. Effective July 1, 2026, the annual salary of each of the several
assistant district attorneys throughout the state of Louisiana, including the parish of
Orleans, is hereby fixed at sixty thousand dollars payable monthly by the state
treasurer upon the warrant of each of the assistant district attorneys. Any increase
in salary shall be subject to an appropriation for that purpose.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1338 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 660
Section 2.A. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when an
Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the
implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
B. The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.